Hawaii statutes.
§441-35 Perpetual care fund expressly
permitted. A perpetual care fund and all payments or contributions to it
are expressly permitted as and for charitable and eleemosynary purposes. No
payment, gift, grant, bequest, or other contribution for perpetual care is
invalid by reason of any indefiniteness or uncertainty of the persons
designated as beneficiaries in the instruments creating the fund, nor is the
fund or any contribution to it invalid as violating any law against
perpetuities, or the suspension of the power of alienation of title to
property. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS §441-35]

Cross References

Uniform statutory rule against perpetuities, see chapter 525.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next